src/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON n-IPFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nah    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį  #;

LEXICON n-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nah    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį  #;

LEXICON n-IPFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nin    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@in    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nat    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in  #;

LEXICON n-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nin    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nat    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@in    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in  #;

LEXICON n-IPFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįh    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįh    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nah    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįh    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįh  #;

LEXICON n-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįh    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįh    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nah    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįh    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįh  #;

LEXICON n-IPFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nagn   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįl    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nal    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įl    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl  #;

LEXICON n-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nagn   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįl    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nal    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įl    #;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl  #;

!
! aa-PFV
!
LEXICON aa-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@         aa-PFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-PFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-PFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   aa-PFV-0-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@D.PREFIX@         aa-PFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-PFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-PFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  aa-PFV-D-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@D.PREFIX@         aa-PFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-PFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-PFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  aa-PFV-H-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@D.PREFIX@         aa-PFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-PFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-PFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  aa-PFV-L-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON aa-PFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį  #;

LEXICON aa-PFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį  #;

LEXICON aa-PFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@at  #;

LEXICON aa-PFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@at  #;

LEXICON aa-PFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh  #;

LEXICON aa-PFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh  #;

LEXICON aa-PFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@agn    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al  #;

LEXICON aa-PFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@agn   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al  #;

!
! n-PFV
!
LEXICON n-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@         n-PFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-PFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-PFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   n-PFV-0-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@D.PREFIX@         n-PFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-PFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-PFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  n-PFV-D-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@D.PREFIX@         n-PFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-PFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-PFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  n-PFV-H-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@D.PREFIX@         n-PFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-PFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-PFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  n-PFV-L-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON n-PFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį  #;

LEXICON n-PFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nįį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nįį  #;

LEXICON n-PFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nin    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nat    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in  #;
